Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3036
Blockchain analytics software; antifraud policy; requirements.

(1) All controllable electronic record kiosk operators shall use blockchain analytics software to assist in the prevention of sending purchased controllable electronic records from an operator to a controllable electronic record wallet known to be affiliated with fraudulent activity at the time of a transaction. The department may request evidence from any controllable electronic record kiosk operator of current use of blockchain analytics.

(2) All controllable electronic record kiosk operators shall take reasonable steps to detect and prevent fraud, including establishing and maintaining a written antifraud policy. The antifraud policy shall, at a minimum, include:

(a) The identification and assessment of fraud-related risk areas;

(b) Procedures and controls to protect against identified risks;

(c) Allocation of responsibility for monitoring risks; and

(d) Procedures for the periodic evaluation and revision of the antifraud procedures, controls, and monitoring mechanisms.

Laws 2025, LB609, § 5.